Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2432
Formal testacy proceedings; will construction; effect of final order in another jurisdiction.

A final order of a court of another state, which state has an applicable provision of law similar in reciprocal effect to this section, determining testacy, the validity or construction of a will, made in a proceeding involving notice to and an opportunity for contest by all interested persons must be accepted as determinative by the courts of this state if it includes, or is based upon, a finding that the decedent was domiciled at his death in the state where the order was made.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 110, UPC § 3-408.

The clear directive of this section is that an order of another state shall be adopted by a Nebraska court only if the other state has a similar law for providing reciprocity of decisions made in Nebraska courts in probate proceedings. In re Estate of Hannan, 2 Neb. App. 636, 513 N.W.2d 339 (1994).